Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
moneys appropriated to the Employment Department by  sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this
2019 Act, collected or received by the Employment Department:
(1) Unemployment insurance,
shared services and workforce
operations, and workforce
and economic research ............. $143,386,601
(2) Office of Administrative
Hearings.................................... $ 29,379,031
(3) Capital improvement................. $ 552,000
(4) Modernization Initiative............ $ 19,967,049
SECTION 2.
(1) There is appropriated to the  Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the modernization funds made available to the state  on June
4, 2009, and July 16, 2009, under section 903(f) of the Social  Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1103(f)),
as amended, the amount of $4,857,463 to be used under the  direction of the Employment
Department for the purposes  of administering unemployment compensation law and public
employment offices and for debt service and capital improvements.
(2) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 1 (1), (3) and (4) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) There is appropriated  to the Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Employment Department Special Administrative  Fund es-
tablished in ORS  657.822, the amount of $40,000,000 to be used under the direction of the
Employment Department for the purposes of administering unemployment compensation  law
and public employment offices and for debt service and capital improvements.
(2) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 1 (1), (3) and (4) of this 2019 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$154,981,070 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2019
Act collected or received by the Employment Department.
SECTION 5. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Employment
Department for unemployment insurance claims  from the Unemployment Compensation
Trust Fund are not limited.
(2) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Employment Department
for benefits paid under the federal Trade Act and for unemployment insurance claims  from
federal funds are not limited.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by Senate May 6, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 28, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5508 (SB 5508-A) Page 2